Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.060

Position qualifications.

(1) Commission positions one through seven shall be filled by persons who meet the following requirements:

(a) Resident of this state;

(b) Resident of the area they represent; and

(c) Actually engaged in owning, operating, or as a broker of bee colonies for the five years immediately preceding their election.

(2) Commission positions eight and nine shall be filled by persons who meet the following requirements:

(a) Resident of this state; and

(b) Actually engaged as a manufacturer, broker of industry products, processor, or first handler for the five years immediately preceding their election.

(3) Commission members shall be immediately disqualified if they no longer meet the qualifications during their terms of office. The vacancy on the commission shall be filled according to *section 38 of this act.

(4) Position eleven shall be filled by a person who qualifies under subsection (1)(c) or (2)(b) of this section and is not a resident of Washington.

[ 1989 c 5 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "section 38 of this act" is incorrect. Apparently a reference to "section 6 of this act," codified as RCW 15.62.070, was intended.